Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 590.3 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Transient Sex
Offender Elimination Act of 2026".
Req. No. 16514 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 590.4 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Transient Sex Offender Elimination Act of 2026:
1. "Approved rehabilitation curriculum" means a structured
series of classes or therapeutic programs that address behavioral
reform including, but not limited to, victims impact, life skills,
step-based study, and reentry planning;
2. "Department" means the Department of Corrections;
3. "Program house" means a residential property for one or more
registered sex offenders, providing housing, supervision, and access
to rehabilitative programming for registered sex offenders;
4. "Sex offender" means any person required to register
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act; and
5. "Transient sex offender" means a registered sex offender who
lacks a fixed residence and whose housing status requires frequent
updates as required by the Sex Offenders Registration Act.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 590.5 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A program house may house more than one registered sex
offender; provided, the number of residents does not exceed the
legal or structural occupancy limit as determined by local housing
codes.
Req. No. 16514 Page 2

B. Program houses shall be located no closer than two thousand
(2,000) feet from protected zones unless otherwise restricted by
local ordinance or structural capacity.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 590.6 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. All incarcerated sex offenders, prior to discharge from the
custody of the Department of Corrections, shall successfully
complete the following programming, if available:
1. Victim impact curriculum, approved by the Department; and
2. Life skills curriculum, approved by the Department that
includes components related to financial literacy, personal
responsibility, and community reintegration.
B. The Department may make the programs provided for in
subsection A of this section available prior to release ensuring
that enrollment and completion are monitored and documented prior to
discharge of the inmate from custody.
C. Any sex offender eligible for community reentry programming
shall also participate in an approved recovery curriculum upon
arrival at the residence. This curriculum may include, but not be
limited to:
1. A structured step-based recovery or accountability program;
2. Ongoing job readiness education and goal setting; and

Req. No. 16514 Page 3

3. Support group participation or therapy as required by
facility standards.
D. Upon release from the custody of the Department, each sex
offender shall be issued a reentry portfolio containing:
1. Identification documents including birth certificate, state
identification card, driver license, or documentation and voucher to
obtain a driver license or a Social Security card;
2. Documentation of program completion if programs are
available; and
3. A housing and employment plan developed with reentry staff.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 590.7 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The provisions of the Transient Sex Offender Elimination Act
of 2026 shall apply retroactively to all eligible individuals
currently classified as sex offenders in the State of Oklahoma.
B. Any person who has been convicted of an offense that
requires the person to register as a sex offender and is currently
in compliance with the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall be
considered eligible for all housing and rehabilitation programs
provided for in this act.
C. Retroactive application includes, but is not limited to:
1. Eligibility to reside in approved program houses as defined
in Section 2 of this act;
Req. No. 16514 Page 4

2. Relief from transient classification if stable housing is
secured under the provisions of this act; and
3. Participation in approved post-release rehabilitation
programs, services, and support systems.
D. The Department shall update internal procedures and
information available to the public to reflect the retroactive
implementation of this act.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16514 GRS 02/18/26














Req. No. 16514 Page 5